Massachusetts, session 194th, H3008.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of Chapter 61A of the general laws is hereby amended by adding at the end of
the first paragraph thereof, the following new sentences:
Whenever an owner holds two or more non-contiguous areas of land in one or more
subdivisions of the commonwealth equaling not less than five acres, said owner shall have right
to apply for the provisions of this section provided all parcels are within a 10-mile radius of one
another, or within the confines of a single municipality. Said acreage shall meet all the
requirements for the benefits of this section as if the land was contiguous.
of 1